Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3617
Board; members; terms.

(1) The initial term of office for members of the appointed board shall be as follows: Three district members shall be appointed for one year; three district members shall be appointed for two years; and two district members shall be appointed for three years. The term of the member appointed at large shall be three years.

(2) Upon completion of the initial term, the term of office for members of the board shall be for three years.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 17.